Washington statutes.
RCW 12.04.208

Form of undertaking to indemnify constable on claim of property by a third person.

FORM OF UNDERTAKING

TO INDEMNIFY CONSTABLE ON CLAIM OF

PROPERTY BY A THIRD PERSON

Whereas, L M, claims to be owner of, and have the right to possession of certain personal property, to wit: [here describe it] which has been taken by J K, constable in . . . . . . county, upon an execution by J P, justice of the peace in and for the county of . . . . . ., upon a judgment obtained by A B, plaintiff, against C D, defendant; Now, therefore, we A B, plaintiff, E F, and G H, acknowledge ourselves bound unto the said J K, constable, in the sum of . . . . . . dollars, to indemnify the said J K against such claim. A B, E F, G H.

[ 1957 c 89 s 10. Prior: Code 1881 s 1885, part; 1873 p 373 c 16, part; 1863 p 370 c 16, part; 1854 p 253 c 19, part; RRS s 1890, part.]